Hawaii, session 2026, HB2529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $222,950,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Honopou Bridge, Maui Plans, design, construction, and appurtenances for the strengthening or replacement of Honopou bridge and improvement of its approaches, including but not limited to:  (A) achieving a minimum legal load rating sufficient for modern fire apparatus and other emergency response vehicles, anticipated to be no less than twenty tons; (B) providing guardrails and pedestrian railings that meet existing bridge safety standards; (C) improving hydraulic capacity and resilience to increased storm flows and sea-level-rise-related impacts, consistent with current best practices for climate adaptation; and (D) implementing any environmental mitigation, cultural resource protection, and consultation required by law; provided that the amounts shall be expended in consultation with the department of transportation. Plans                          $800,000 Land                         $2,000,000 Design                         $800,000 Construction                $12,000,000 Total funding                    $15,600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. 2.   Molokai biosecurity plan and facility for inspection and quarantine Plans, land, design, and construction for a plant and materials quarantine facility as well as the development and adoption of a comprehensive biosecurity plan focused on preventing the introduction of invasive species not currently present on Molokai. Plans                          $250,000 Land                         $2,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $12,000,000 Total funding                    $15,250,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity. 3.   District 13 public schools Plans, land, and construction for various capital improvement projects for public schools in district 13. Plans                        $1,000,000 Land                         $1,000,000 Construction                $28,000,000 Total funding                    $30,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Hana highway Plans and construction for the repair of Hana highway. Plans                        $1,500,000 Construction                $15,000,000 Total funding                    $16,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 5.   Lanai airport Plans and construction for a taxiway at Lanai airport. Plans                        $1,000,000 Construction                $15,000,000 Total funding                    $16,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 6.   Lanai airport Plans, design, and construction for improvements to Lanai airport terminal and overnight parking. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $13,000,000 Total funding                    $15,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 7.   Molokai airport Plans, design, and construction for improvements to Molokai airport terminal and overnight parking. Plans                          $800,000 Design                         $800,000 Construction                 $7,000,000 Total funding                     $8,600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 8.   Molokai highways Plans, design, and construction for repairs and maintenance of sections of roadway in east Molokai that have deteriorated due to flooding, river diversions, erosion, and sea level rise. Plans                        $1,000,000 Design                       $1,000,000 Construction                $12,000,000 Total funding                    $14,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 9.   Molokai highways Plans, design, and construction for filling or removal of rumble strips from the center of the road in Molokai, starting at the 9.5-mile marker on Kamehameha V highway East. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $1,998,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 10.  Paia bypass Plans, design, and construction for Paia bypass. Plans                        $5,000,000 Design                       $5,000,000 Construction                $80,000,000 Total funding                    $90,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________